New York, session 2025-2026, A939.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3204-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3204-a. Administration of the TASC examination in the Chinese and 4 Korean languages. 1. Students who are proficient in the Chinese or Kore- 5 an language and of limited English proficiency shall be entitled to 6 receive instruction in preparation for the TASC examination and the 7 administration of such examination in the Chinese or Korean language. 8 2. The commissioner shall require each board of education, including 9 the board of each community school district of the city of New York, 10 make available to all pupils proficient in the Chinese or Korean 11 language, and of limited proficiency in English, the official TASC exam- 12 ination written in such native language, and make available any instruc- 13 tional courses or programs for the preparation of such examination, 14 which are offered by the school district, including course materials, in 15 such native language. The commissioner shall further direct that any 16 notification or correspondence relating to the administration of the 17 TASC examination shall be written in the Chinese or Korean language. 18 3. Each school district shall obtain and maintain a record of pupils 19 who have the TASC examination administered in the Chinese or Korean 20 language and shall report such information to the department on an annu- 21 al basis. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02967-01-5 A. 939 2 1 § 2. The commissioner of education is hereby authorized to promulgate 2 any rules or regulations necessary for the implementation of this act, 3 including, but not limited to, rules or regulations directing the 4 department to enter into a contract with the American Council on Educa- 5 tion to develop and provide appropriate testing materials. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 7 it shall have become a law.